Idaho, session 2025, H0455.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Environmental Quality the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $101,900 $101,900
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 425,300 425,300
TOTAL $527,200 $527,200
II. AIR QUALITY:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $396,400 $396,400


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
III. WATER QUALITY:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $456,700 $456,700
IPDES Program
Fund 47,700 47,700
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 456,700 $7,500 $59,452,200 59,916,400
TOTAL $961,100 $7,500 $59,452,200 $60,420,800
IV. WASTE MANAGEMENT AND REMEDIATION:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $231,700 $231,700
Environmental Remediation (Triumph Mine)
Fund $1,000,000 $30,000 1,030,000
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 0 9,932,800 4,000,000 13,932,800
TOTAL $231,700 $10,932,800 $4,030,000 $15,194,500
V. IDAHO NATIONAL LABORATORY OVERSIGHT:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund $60,000 $60,000
GRAND TOTAL $2,176,400 $10,940,300 $63,482,200 $76,598,900
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Environmental Quality is hereby
reduced by the following amounts, according to the designated programs, from
personnel costs, from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
I. ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
DepartmentofEnvironmentalQuality(Federal)Fund 80,800


II. AIR QUALITY:
FROM:
DepartmentofEnvironmentalQuality(Federal)Fund 147,200
III. WATER QUALITY:
FROM:
DepartmentofEnvironmentalQuality(Federal)Fund 252,000
IV. WASTE MANAGEMENT AND REMEDIATION:
FROM:
DepartmentofEnvironmentalQuality(Federal)Fund 221,600
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund 461,000
TOTAL $682,600
GRAND TOTAL $1,162,600
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMEN-
TAL QUALITY (GENERAL) FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department
of Environmental Quality any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropri-
ated to the Department of Environmental Quality in the Administration and
Support Services Program from the General Fund not to exceed $2,500,000 from
the Department of Environmental Quality (General) Fund, to be used for non-
recurring expenditures related to document management implementation for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Con-
troller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class,
and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER FOR DRINKING AND WASTEWATER GRANTS. There
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Environmental Quality and the
Office of the State Controller shall transfer $10,000,000 from the General
Fund to the Water Pollution Control Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon there-
after as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, to be
used for drinking and wastewater grants.
SECTION 5. DRINKING AND WASTEWATER GRANTS. It is the intent of the Leg-
islature to provide up to $10,000,000 for up to five years to support con-
struction of drinking water and wastewater projects. The Department of En-
vironmental Quality will provide funding in the form of grants for construc-
tion of drinking water and wastewater projects using a tiered approach that
provides the highest level of grant funding to prioritize smaller systems
and other factors, including monthly user rates, median income, and readi-
ness to proceed. The Department may also use funds appropriated pursuant to
Section 1 of this act to fund eligible planning grant requests received con-
sistent with existing department processes. These moneys shall be adminis-


tered by the Board of Environmental Quality through a competitive, matching
grant process. The Department of Environmental Quality shall provide a re-
port to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and the Legislative Ser-
vices Office no later than December 1, 2025. The report shall include iden-
tification of the grant recipients and grant amounts and the balance of any
appropriated funds not committed to recipients at the time of the report be-
ing submitted.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS AND PROGRAM TRANSFER LIM-
ITATIONS. For fiscal year 2025, the Department of Environmental Quality
is hereby exempted from the provisions of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code,
allowing unlimited transfers between programs for indirect costs, for all
moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to another
fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 7 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 6 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.